Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.525.070

Development of school building programs—Assistance of superintendent of public instruction.

The superintendent of public instruction shall furnish to school districts seeking state assistance consultatory and advisory service in connection with the development of school building programs and the planning of school plant facilities for such district.

[ 2006 c 263 s 305; 1985 c 136 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.47.100. Prior: 1947 c 278 s 6; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4940-17. Formerly RCW 28A.47.100, 28.47.100.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.